Utah statutes.
63M-1-414.   Annual report.

(1)  Each county applicant or municipal applicant designated as an enterprise zone shall annually report to the office regarding the economic activity that has occurred in the zone following the designation.

(2)  This information shall include:

(a)  the number of jobs created in the zone;

(b)  the number of economically disadvantaged individuals receiving public job training assistance in the zone;

(c)  the average wage level of the jobs created;

(d)  descriptions of any affirmative action programs undertaken by the county applicant or municipal applicant in connection with the enterprise zone;

(e)  the amount of the county applicant's or municipal applicant's local contribution; and

(f)  the number of businesses qualifying for, or directly benefiting from, the local contribution.

